Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB793.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1554(b) and (g) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1554. Holocaust, Genocide and Human Rights Violations Instruction.--* * *(a.1) (1) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a school entity that offers instruction under subsection (a) shall post the title or Internet link for every primary resource used by the school entity and a course syllabus or a written summary of the instruction offered by the school entity on the school 1234567891011121314151617181920 entity's publicly accessible Internet website. The information shall be updated at least every three years.(2) The chief school administrator or a designee shall implement the requirements of this subsection.(3) This subsection shall not be construed to require a school entity to violate the copyright, trademark or other intellectual property right of the creator or owner of curriculum.(b) (1) The Department of Education shall establish curriculum guidelines no later than twelve (12) months after the effective date of this section. The guidelines shall encourage the inclusion of all of the following subjects where appropriate in the instruction:(i) The breadth of the history of the Holocaust, including the Third Reich dictatorship, concentration camp system, persecution of Jews and non-Jews, Jewish and non-Jewish resistance and post-World War II trials.(ii) The definition, history, response and actions taken in the face of genocide, including the Holocaust and any other genocide perpetrated against humanity, including the Rwandan genocide and other genocides committed in Africa, Asia and Europe.(iii) Human rights violations.(iv) Anti-Semitism, racism and the abridgment of civil rights.(2) The Department of Education shall work in consultation with organizations and individuals that provide educational expertise and resources related to the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations to develop the curriculum guidelines. The guidelines shall state the minimum amount of instruction 20250HB0793PN0817 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary to adequately educate students on the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations.(3) The Department of Education shall post the curriculum guidelines on the Department of Education's publicly accessible Internet website.* * *(g) [For purposes of this section, the term "school entity" shall mean a] As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chief school administrator." The superintendent of a school district, administrative director of an area career and technical school, executive director of an intermediate unit or chief executive officer of a charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school."Primary resource." A textbook, resource or online material approved by the governing board of a school entity that is used as the basis or primary source of instruction for a course and consistently by a majority of students in the course."School entity." A school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0793PN0817 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223